src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON preterite_КЫЙНЫ
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@+Ind+Prt1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@%>{иі} PresPret1 ; 
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@+Ind+Prt1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@%>{иі}  P3 ; ! 3 
:	Pret2a_0 ;

LEXICON preterite_АМНЫ
 preterite ;
!2018-01-29!@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@+Ind+Prt1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@%>{иі} PresPret1 ; 
!2018-01-29!@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@+Ind+Prt1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@%>{иі}  P3 ; ! 3 
!2018-01-29!	Pret2a_0 ;

LEXICON preterite_КУТНЫ
 preterite ;
!2018-01-29!@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@+Ind+Prt1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@%>{иі} PresPret1 ; 
!2018-01-29!@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@+Ind+Prt1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@%>{иі}  P3 ; ! 3 
!2018-01-29!	Pret2a_0 ;

LEXICON imperative
@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@+Imprt+Pl2:@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@%>ӧй VerbEnd ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe+Imprt+Pl2:@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@%>эй VerbEnd ;

!LEXICON PossessiveSuffixes
!@U.PossPx.Sg1@+PxSg1:@U.PossPx.Sg1@%>ым VerbEnd ;
!            PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; 2025-01-11


LEXICON PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1
@D.PossPx@     VerbEnd ; !The ZERO Tag is used for +PxSg1 2017-03-23
@U.PossPx.Sg1@+PxSg1+Err/Orth-pxsg1:@U.PossPx.Sg1@%>ӧ  VerbEnd ;
@U.PossPx.Sg1@+PxSg1+Err/Orth-pxsg1:@U.PossPx.Sg1@%>ӧй  VerbEnd ;
@U.PossPx.Sg1@+PxSg1+Err/Orth-pxsg1:@U.PossPx.Sg1@%>ым  VerbEnd ;
@U.PossPx.Sg2@+PxSg2:@U.PossPx.Sg2@%>ыд  VerbEnd ;
@U.PossPx.Sg3@+PxSg3:@U.PossPx.Sg3@%>ыс  VerbEnd ;
@U.PossPx.Pl1@+PxPl1:@U.PossPx.Pl1@%>ным VerbEnd ;
@U.PossPx.Pl2@+PxPl2:@U.PossPx.Pl2@%>ныд VerbEnd ;
@U.PossPx.Pl3@+PxPl3:@U.PossPx.Pl3@%>ныс VerbEnd ;


LEXICON PresPret1  ! First and second person
@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.1@+Sg1:@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.1@ VerbEnd_Comparison ; 
@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.2@+Sg2:@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.2@%>н VerbEnd_Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@+Pl1:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@%>м VerbEnd_Comparison ; 
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@+Pl1+Use/NG+Err/Orth:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@%>мӧ VerbEnd_Comparison ; 
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@+Pl1+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Err/Orth-e-not-oe:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@%>ме VerbEnd_Comparison ; 
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@+Pl1:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@%>мӧй VerbEnd_Comparison ;  ! imperatiivi / optatiivi ??
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@+Pl1+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@%>мей VerbEnd_Comparison ;  ! imperatiivi / optatiivi ??
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@+Pl2:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@%>нныд VerbEnd_Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@+Pl2+Use/NG+Err/Orth:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@%>д VerbEnd_Comparison ; 

LEXICON P3         
@U.CONJ-PX.3@:@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>с PresPret1_SgPl3 ; ! This is regular
@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-PX.3@  PresPret1_SgPl3 ; ! This is usually restricted to intransitives


LEXICON PresPret1_SgPl3
  SG3 ; 
  PL3 ;
  
LEXICON SG3
@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Sg3:@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.3@ VerbEnd_Comparison ;
  
LEXICON PL3
!duplicate@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Pl3:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>ны VerbEnd_Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Pl3:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>ны VerbEnd_Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Pl3+Err/Orth-i-not-y:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>ні VerbEnd_Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Pl3+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>ныс VerbEnd_Comparison ;

LEXICON Pret2a
:{ая} PRET2-linkki-a ; 
   PRET2PL2 ; 
   PL3 ;   ! for continuation in different persons. 
                  !Could also have used the homonymic participle
                  ! as point of departure

LEXICON PRET2PL2
@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.2@+Sg2:@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.2@%>ыд VerbEnd_Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@+Pl2:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@%>ныд VerbEnd_Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@+Pl2:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@%>ныдӧсь VerbEnd_Comparison ; !224
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@+Pl2+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@%>ныдэсь VerbEnd_Comparison ; !224
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Pl3:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>ны VerbEnd_Comparison ; !227
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Pl3+Err/Orth-i-not-y:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>ні VerbEnd_Comparison ; !227

LEXICON PRET2-linkki-a
!+Sg1+Use/NG+Err/Orth: VerbEnd_Comparison ; ! no Sg1 for Prt2 in the standard
@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.1@+Sg1:@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.1@ VerbEnd_Comparison ;  
@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Sg3:@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.3@ VerbEnd_Comparison ;
!+Pl1+Use/NG+Err/Orth:%>ӧсь VerbEnd_Comparison ; ! no Pl1 for Prt2 in the standard
!+Pl1+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Err/Orth-e-not-oe:%>эсь VerbEnd_Comparison ; ! no Pl1 for Prt2 in the standard
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@+Pl1:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@%>ӧсь VerbEnd_Comparison ; 
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Pl3:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>ӧсь VerbEnd_Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@+Pl1+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@%>эсь VerbEnd_Comparison ; 
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Pl3+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>эсь VerbEnd_Comparison ;

LEXICON MatrixVerb_Comparison
               VERB_K ;
+Der+Der/moz+Ger:%>моз VERB_K ;
+Comp:%>джык VERB_K ;
+Der/kodj:%>кодь VERB_K ;

!This is where Serial verbs are made possible
LEXICON VerbEnd_Comparison
 Serial-Verbs ;
 MatrixVerb_Comparison ;

LEXICON VerbEnd
 Serial-Verbs ;
 VERB_K ;

!! ## Derivation
! ==========

LEXICON Nonfiniteforms
VerbDer ; ! to be merged with next
          !2011-11-02 dealing with serial verbs there may be
          ! reason to distinguish between V2V derivation and non-finite forms

LEXICON Verb_nyDer !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
Verb_nyDer_ONSET_CONS ;
Verb_nyDer_ONSET_VOW ;

LEXICON Verb_nyDer_ONSET_CONS !!≈ * **@CODE@** Derivation onset in consonant
!! verb-to-verb

!! This is fed by LEXICON V_ШУНЫ, and therefore certain corrections
!! must be made 2012-01-18

@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/l:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@%>л  V_ВОЛЫНЫ ; !!босьтлыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/lyvly:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@%>лывл V_ВОЛЫНЫ ; !!босьтлывлыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/sjy:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@%>сь V_ЛЫДДЬЫНЫ ; !! овсьыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/sjy+Der/ysht:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@%>сьышт V_ШУНЫ ; !!вежсьыштны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/sjy+Der/ysht+Der/lyvly:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@%>сьыштлывл V_ВОЛЫНЫ ; !! пусьыштлывлыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/sjy+Der/ysht+Der/ly:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@%>сьыштл V_ВОЛЫНЫ ; !!?? пусьыштлыны
! зь:зь  !!югзьыны
! Why do the suffixes above have ">" marking
! while the ones below do not?
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/chy:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ч V_ЛЫДДЬЫНЫ ; !!босьтчыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/chy+Der/l:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@чыл V_ШУНЫ ; !!дӧзмӧдчывны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/chy+Der/ysht+Der/ly:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@чыштл V_ВОЛЫНЫ ; !!босьтчыштлыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/chy+Der/ysht+Der/lyvly:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@чыштлывл V_ВОЛЫНЫ ; !! босьтчыштлывлыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/chy+Der/ysht:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@чышт V_ШУНЫ ; !!босьтчыштны

LEXICON Verb_nyDer_ONSET_VOW !!≈ * **@CODE@** Derivation onset	in vowel
 Verb_nyDer_ONSET_Ы ;
 Verb_nyDer_ONSET_А ;

LEXICON Verb_nyDer_ONSET_Ы !!≈ * **@CODE@** Derivation onset	in vowel
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/ysht+Der/ly:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ыштл V_ВОЛЫНЫ ;   !!сёйыштлыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/ysht+Der/lyvly:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ыштлывл V_ВОЛЫНЫ ;  !!сёйыштлывлыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/ysht:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ышт V_ШУНЫ ; !!сёйыштны

LEXICON Verb_nyDer_ONSET_А !!≈ * **@CODE@** Derivation onset	in vowel
	Verb_nyDer_ONSET_А/Я ;
LEXICON Verb_nyDer_ONSET_А/Я
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/al:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@%>{ая}л V_ШУНЫ ; !!сетавны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/ovt:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@%>овт V_ШУНЫ ; !!пановтны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/ovt+Err/Dial:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@%>ол^C2Vт V_ШУНЫ ; !!пановтны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/asj:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@%>{ая}сь V_ШУНЫ ; !! босьтасьны

LEXICON Verb_nyDer_ONSET_Я !!≈ * **@CODE@** Derivation onset	in vowel
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/al:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@%>{ая}л V_ШУНЫ ; !!сетавны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/ovt:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@%>ёвт V_ШУНЫ ; !!пановтны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/ovt+Err/Dial:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@%>ёл^C2Vт V_ШУНЫ ; !!пановтны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/asj:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@%>{ая}сь V_ШУНЫ ; !! босьтасьны


!! verb-to-noun
 
LEXICON VerbDer !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
 VerbDer_ONSET_Ӧ ; !! FIX THIS 2015-09-06
 VerbDer_ONSET_А/Я ; !!≈ * **@CODE@** 

LEXICON VerbDer_КЫЙНЫ !!≈ * **@CODE@**
: VerbDer_ONSET_Ӧ ; !!≈ * **@CODE@**
: VerbDer_ONSET_Я ; !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
: VerbDer_ONSET_И ; !!≈ * **@CODE@**

LEXICON VerbDer_КУТНЫ !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 VerbDer_ONSET_Ӧ ; !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 VerbDer_ONSET_А ; !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
 VerbDer_ONSET_І ; !!≈ * **@CODE@**

LEXICON VerbDer_АРТАСЬНЫ !!≈ * **@CODE@**
: VerbDer_ONSET_Ӧ ; !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 VerbDer_ONSET_Я ; !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
 VerbDer_ONSET_И ; !!≈ * **@CODE@**

LEXICON VerbDer_ONSET_Ӧ !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
@C.CONJ-INF@+Der+Der/wm+Der/NomAct+N:@C.CONJ-INF@%>ӧм N_ ;
+Der+Der/wm+PastPtc:%>ӧм VERB_K ;
@C.CONJ-INF@+Der+Der/wm+PastPtc+N:@C.CONJ-INF@%>ӧма N_ ; !OKK:50
+Der+Der/wm+Der+Der/NomAct+Ger:%>ӧмпырысь VERB_K ;
@C.CONJ-INF@+Der+Der/wm+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ins:@C.CONJ-INF@%>ӧмӧн VERB_K ;
@C.CONJ-INF@+Der+Der/wm+Der/In+N:@C.CONJ-INF@%>ӧм%>{иі}н N_ ;
@C.CONJ-INF@+Der+Der/wm+Der/In+N:@C.CONJ-INF@%>ӧм%>тор N_PARAGOGIC_J ;

@C.CONJ-INF@+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe+Der+Der/NomAct+N:@C.CONJ-INF@%>эм N_ ;! remove +Der/wm 2023-06-09
+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe+Der+Der/wm+PastPtc:%>эм VERB_K ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe+Der+Der+Der/NomAct+Ger:%>эмпырысь VERB_K ;! remove +Der/wm 2023-06-09
@C.CONJ-INF@+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe+Der+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ins:@C.CONJ-INF@%>эмен VERB_K ;! remove +Der/wm 2023-06-09
@C.CONJ-INF@+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe+Der+Der/wm+Der/In+N:@C.CONJ-INF@%>эм%>{иі}н N_ ;

@C.CONJ-INF@+Der+Der/An+Der/In+N:@C.CONJ-INF@%>{ая}н%>{иі}н N_ ;
@C.CONJ-INF@+Der+Der/An+Der/In+N:@C.CONJ-INF@%>{ая}н%>тор N_PARAGOGIC_J ;
@C.CONJ-INF@+Der+Der/An+PrsPrc+N:@C.CONJ-INF@%>{ая}н N_ ;
!2017-10-27+Der+Der/An+ActPrsPtc:%>{ая}н VERB_K ;
+Der+Der/An+PrsPtc:%>{ая}н VERB_K ;
+Der+Der/ysj+ActPrsPtc:%>ысь VERB_K ; ! 2020-11-19 adjectival
+Der+Der/ysj+ActPrsPtc:%>ысь COP_PL ; ! 2020-11-19 adjectival
@C.CONJ-INF@+Der+Der/NomAg+N:@C.CONJ-INF@%>ысь N_ ;!remove +Der/ysj 2023-06-09

LEXICON VerbDer_ONSET_І !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
  ! nonfinites
 VerbDer_ONSET_И/І ;

LEXICON VerbDer_ONSET_И !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
 VerbDer_ONSET_И/І ;
